Colorado, session 2026A, HB1010.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-46.3-100.3, add
(2.6) as follows:
24-46.3-100.3. Definitions.
As used in this article 46.3, unless the context otherwise requires:
(2.6) "OLDER ADULT" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS FIFTY-FIVE
YEARS OLD OR OLDER.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-46.3-101, add (2.1)
as follows:
24-46.3-101. State work force development council - creation -
membership - funding through gifts, grants, and donations.
(2.1) FOR APPOINTMENTS TO THE STATE COUNCIL, OR A SUCCESSOR
ENTITY, MADE ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION (2.1),
AT LEAST ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2)(d) OF THIS SECTION MUST BE AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(a) IS AN OLDER ADULT; AND
(b) EITHER IS ACTIVELY INVOLVED IN OR HAS INTEREST,
KNOWLEDGE, OR EXPERIENCE IN ADVOCATING FOR THE INTERESTS OF OLDER
ADULTS IN THE WORKFORCE.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 24-46.3-107 as
follows:
24-46.3-107. Meet with Colorado commission on aging - collect
data - "SMART Act" hearing.
(1) (a) BEGINNING IN 2027, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, STAFF OR
APPOINTED MEMBERS OF THE STATE COUNCIL SHALL MEET TWICE A YEAR
WITH THE COLORADO COMMISSION ON THE AGING, CREATED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 26-11-101, OR A WORKFORCE-RELATED SUBCOMMITTEE OF THE
COLORADO COMMISSION ON THE AGING, ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 26-11-102.
(b) THE STATE COUNCIL SHALL INVITE REPRESENTATIVES OF ENTITIES
WITH DEMONSTRATED INTEREST OR EXPERIENCE IN WORKFORCE SERVICES
FOR OLDER ADULTS, INCLUDING COMMUNITY-BASED ORGANIZATIONS,
ADVOCACY GROUPS, WORKFORCE POLICY EXPERTS, AND NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATIONS, TO PARTICIPATE IN THE MEETINGS HELD PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE STATE COUNCIL, THE COLORADO COMMISSION ON THE
AGING, AND ANY OTHER PARTICIPATING ENTITIES SHALL WORK
COLLABORATIVELY TO:
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1010

(a) PROMOTE WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND FOSTER
SELF-SUFFICIENCY FOR OLDER ADULTS IN THE STATE;
(b) EXAMINE ISSUES RELATED TO EMPLOYMENT ACCESS, TRAINING,
SUPPORT, AND SERVICES FOR OLDER ADULTS IN THE STATE;
(c) REVIEW DATA COLLECTED THROUGH EXISTING RESOURCES AND
PLATFORMS BY THE STATE COUNCIL OR THE COLORADO COMMISSION ON THE
AGING RELATED TO OLDER ADULTS IN THE WORKFORCE;
(d) DISCUSS AND DETERMINE WHETHER ADDITIONAL DATA SHOULD
BE COLLECTED BY THE STATE COUNCIL OR THE COLORADO COMMISSION ON
THE AGING REGARDING OLDER ADULTS IN THE WORKFORCE TO ASSIST IN
FURTHERING THE OBJECTIVES SET FORTH IN SUBSECTIONS (2)(a) AND (2)(b)
OF THIS SECTION; AND
(e) PROVIDE AN OVERVIEW TO THE DEPARTMENT AND THE
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES, ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 OF EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, OF THE DATA
COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2).
(3) BEGINNING IN 2028, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
DEPARTMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL JOINTLY
SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY COMPILING THE DATA
COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION AND SUMMARIZING THE STATE OF
WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND EMPLOYMENT ACCESS FOR OLDER ADULTS
IN THE STATE, AND THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUMMARIZE THE REPORT IN ITS
PRESENTATION TO THE SENATE BUSINESS, LABOR, AND TECHNOLOGY
COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES BUSINESS AFFAIRS AND
LABOR COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, DURING THE
HEARINGS HELD PURSUANT TO THE "SMART ACT", PART 2 OF ARTICLE 7 OF
TITLE 2.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 26-11-105, add (2) as
follows:
26-11-105. Duties of commission - report.
(2) BEGINNING IN 2027, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
COMMISSION, OR A WORKFORCE-RELATED SUBCOMMITTEE OF THE
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1010

COMMISSION, SHALL MEET TWICE A YEAR WITH AND WORK
COLLABORATIVELY WITH THE STATE WORK FORCE DEVELOPMENT COUNCIL,
CREATED IN SECTION 24-46.3-101, TO PERFORM THE DUTIES SET FORTH IN
SECTION 24-46.3-107.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-1-102, amend
(3)(b) as follows:
23-1-102. Commission established - terms of office.
(3) (b) The governor shall select WHEN APPOINTING the members of
the commission, THE GOVERNOR SHALL ENSURE THAT:
(I) THE MEMBERS ARE SELECTED on the basis of their knowledge of
and interest in higher education;
(II) At least one member of the commission must reside RESIDES
west of the continental divide;
(III) ON AND AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION (3)(b),
AS AMENDED, THE GOVERNOR MAY APPOINT AT LEAST ONE MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION THAT IS AT LEAST FIFTY-FIVE YEARS OLD AND EITHER IS
ACTIVELY INVOLVED IN OR HAS INTEREST, KNOWLEDGE, OR EXPERIENCE IN
ADVOCATING FOR THE INTERESTS OF INDIVIDUALS ENGAGED IN HIGHER
EDUCATION WHO ARE FIFTY-FIVE YEARS OLD OR OLDER; AND
(IV) No THE COMMISSION DOES NOT HAVE more than a minimum
majority of the members of the commission may be affiliated with the same
political party at any time.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-1-103, amend
(1)(c); and add (1)(d) as follows:
23-1-103. Advisory committee to the Colorado commission on
higher education.
(1) There is hereby established an advisory committee to the
commission for the purpose of suggesting solutions for the problems and
needs of higher education and maintaining liaison with the general assembly
and the governing boards for state-supported institutions of higher
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1010

education. The advisory committee shall consist of not less than thirteen
members, to be designated as follows:
(c) Not more than four additional members representing educational
or other groups may be selected and designated by the commission to serve
on the advisory committee; AND
(d) THE COMMISSION SHALL SELECT AND DESIGNATE ONE MEMBER
WHO IS AT LEAST FIFTY-FIVE YEARS OLD AND EITHER IS ACTIVELY INVOLVED
IN OR HAS INTEREST, KNOWLEDGE, OR EXPERIENCE IN ADVOCATING FOR THE
INTERESTS OF INDIVIDUALS ENGAGED IN HIGHER EDUCATION WHO ARE
FIFTY-FIVE YEARS OLD OR OLDER.
SECTION 7. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect January 1, 2027; except that, if a referendum petition is filed
pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state constitution against this act
or an item, section, or part of this act within the ninety-day period after final
adjournment of the general assembly, then the act, item, section, or part will
not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1010

held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect January 1, 2027,
or on the date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor,
whichever is later.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1010